District of Columbia statutes.
35-201

Competitive lines on fixed routes and schedules; certificate of convenience and necessity required.

No competitive street railway or bus line, that is, bus or railway line for the transportation of passengers of the character which runs over a given route on a fixed schedule, shall be established without the prior issuance of a certificate by the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia to the effect that the competitive line is necessary for the convenience of the public.

Jan. 14, 1933, 47 Stat. 760, ch. 10, § 4
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
1981 Ed., § 44-201.
1973 Ed., § 44-201.